Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally

§§ 4901,
4902.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 4903.
Transporting prisoner through State.

Whenever an offender is apprehended in a neighboring state, and it may be necessary to transport him or her through this State to the place where the offense was committed, a Superior Court judge, upon application and proof that lawful process has issued against the offender, shall issue a warrant under his or her hand and seal, directed to a sheriff or his or her deputy, or to a person by name who shall be sworn to the faithful performance of his or her duty, authorizing such conveyance.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 105.

§ 4904.
Duty of officer.

Such person or officer shall cause the offender to be conveyed to the line of this State nearest to the state where the offense was committed, there to be delivered to some proper officer ready to receive him or her.
All persons to whom the warrant may be directed are required to obey such order, upon payment or tender of the lawful fees therefor.

§ 4905.
By officers of New York state.

The authorities of the state of New York shall have the same power and authority to detain and transport through this State persons convicted of offenses and sentenced to be confined in a penitentiary in the state of New York, which they have to detain and transport them in such state.

§ 4906.
By officers of New Hampshire.

The authorities of the state of New Hampshire shall have the same power and authority to detain and transport through this State prisoners arrested in New Hampshire and held for trial or commitment by a court of record in New Hampshire, which they have to detain and transport them in that state.

§ 4907.
Service of criminal process returnable in Massachusetts.

Jurisdiction to serve criminal process returnable to a court in the commonwealth of Massachusetts is hereby given to officers who, by the laws of such commonwealth, may serve such process, over a building situated partly in such commonwealth and partly in this State.

Subsection (a) of this section shall take effect when the commonwealth of Massachusetts has given like jurisdiction to similar officers in this State to serve criminal process returnable to a court in Vermont.

§ 4908.
Powers of officers from another state.

A sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, or other officer or justice of a neighboring state, with his or her assistants, in the execution of any lawful process issuing from and returnable to a court in such state, may pass through this State and convey such persons or things as he or she may have in his or her custody by virtue of such process, in as full and ample a manner as an officer of this State might do.

§ 4909.
Impeding officers of other states.

If a person assaults or obstructs an officer or his or her assistants passing through this State in the execution of any warrant or like process, he or she shall be liable to the same punishment as for assaulting or obstructing an officer of this State.

§ 4910.
Receiving person from officer of another state.

A sheriff shall receive a person charged with crime, delivered to him or her by an officer of another state having a warrant from proper authority for delivering the person, and shall take him or her forthwith before a district judge for examination.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. April 9, 1974.